Hawaii, session 2026, SB2581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to promote products manufactured in Hawaii; expand the export of Hawaii-made goods; attract foreign and domestic investment and commercial activity to the State; foster sister-state, educational, athletic, and cultural exchanges; and advance initiatives that yield economic benefits for Hawaii by: (1)  Expanding the purposes of the establishment and operation of offices in out-of-state locations to include serving Hawaii's businesses through various initiatives; (2)  Requiring and appropriating funds for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to establish an out‑of-state office in Seoul, Republic of Korea; and (3)  Appropriating funds for the department of business, economic development, and tourism's Beijing office and Taipei office to promote "Made in Hawaii" branded products and increase the export of Hawaii products. SECTION 2.  Section 201-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§201-81  Establishment of out-of-state offices; purposes.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may establish and operate offices and facilities in out-of-state locations, including foreign nations, to effectuate the following purposes: (1)  Develop programs to reach targeted companies or industries in the respective area and surrounding regions; (2)  Monitor out-of-state government policies and regulations that have an impact on business, markets, sales, tourism, and related activities; (3)  Host government and business officials at conferences, meetings and social occasions, or other events on matters pertaining to business opportunities and attraction of investments for the State; (4)  Develop and conduct advertising efforts, promotional events, media coverage, and educational programs regarding commerce in the State; (5)  Conduct related operations as needed, including hiring or contracting for consultants; (6)  Support sister-state or province relationships, as defined in section 229-1, and other partnerships that promote and enrich the people, cultures, environments, and economies of the State and its international partners; [and] (7)  Create stable linkages between Hawaii and their respective regions; (8)  Host and organize trade missions; (9)  Introduce and market hew products and services from Hawaii; (10)  Act as a conduit for economic and business-related information between Hawaii and their respective regions; (11)  Match businesses in Hawaii with opportunities in the respective area; (12)  Promote Hawaii tourism; (13)  Collaborate with tourism agencies and stakeholders to execute tourism strategies; (14)  Support and implement the department's programs; and [(7)] (15)  Generate revenue for the State." SECTION 3.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall establish an out-of-state office in Seoul, Republic of Korea, as authorized under section 201-81, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of business, economic development, and tourism to establish an out-of-state office in Seoul, Republic of Korea. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of business, economic development, and tourism's Beijing office and Taipei office to promote "Made in Hawaii" branded products and increase the export of Hawaii products. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________